Hawaii statutes.
§841-3 Duties. [(a)] As soon as any
coroner or deputy coroner has notice of the death of any person within the
coroner's or deputy coroner's jurisdiction as the result of violence, or as the
result of any accident, or by suicide, or suddenly when in apparent health, or
when unattended by a physician, or in prison, or in a suspicious or unusual
manner, or within twenty-four hours after admission to a hospital or
institution, the coroner or deputy coroner shall forthwith inquire into and
make a complete investigation of the cause of the death.

[(b)] Any person who becomes aware of the
death of any person under any of the circumstances set forth above shall
immediately notify the coroner or deputy coroner of the known facts concerning
the time, place, manner, and circumstances of the death.

[(c)] Any person who fails to report the death
of a person under circumstances covered herein shall be subject to a fine of
not more than $100. [L 1935, c 90, §3; RL 1945, §10903; am L 1949, c 355, §1;
RL 1955, §260-3; HRS §715-3; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 153, §1;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next